Florida, session 2026, HB295.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
42
43 Section 1. Subsection (5) of section 985.265, Florida
44 Statutes, is amended to read:
45 985.265 Detention transfer and release; education; adult
46 jails.—
47 (5) The court shall order the delivery of a child to a
48 jail or other facility intended or used for the detention of
49 adults:
50 (a) When the child has been transferred or indicted for
Page 2 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
51 criminal prosecution as an adult under part X, except that:
52 1. The court may not order or allow a child alleged to
53 have committed a misdemeanor who is being transferred for
54 criminal prosecution pursuant to either s. 985.556 or s. 985.557
55 to be detained or held in a jail or other facility intended or
56 used for the detention of adults; however, such child may be
57 held temporarily in a detention facility; and
58 2. A child who has been transferred for criminal
59 prosecution as an adult pursuant to s. 985.557 may not be held
60 in a jail or other facility intended or used for the detention
61 of adults before a court finding, as a result of a hearing under
62 s. 985.557(3), that the child should be prosecuted as an adult,
63 unless the child waives his or her right to such hearing; or
64 (b) When a child taken into custody in this state is
65 wanted by another jurisdiction for prosecution as an adult.
66
67 The child shall be housed separately from adult inmates to
68 prohibit a child from having regular contact with incarcerated
69 adults, including trusties. "Regular contact" means sight and
70 sound contact. Separation of children from adults shall permit
71 no more than haphazard or accidental contact. The receiving jail
72 or other facility shall contain a separate section for children
73 and shall have an adequate staff to supervise and monitor the
74 child's activities at all times. Supervision and monitoring of
75 children includes physical observation and documented checks by
Page 3 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
76 jail or receiving facility supervisory personnel at intervals
77 not to exceed 10 minutes. This subsection does not prohibit
78 placing two or more children in the same cell. Under no
79 circumstances shall a child be placed in the same cell with an
80 adult.
81 Section 2. Subsections (4) and (5) of section 985.556,
82 Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (3) and (4),
83 respectively, and subsection (2) and present subsection (3) of
84 that section are amended to read:
85 985.556 Waiver of juvenile court jurisdiction; hearing.—
86 (2) INVOLUNTARY DISCRETIONARY WAIVER.—Except as provided
87 in subsection (3), The state attorney may file a motion
88 requesting the court to transfer the child for criminal
89 prosecution if the child was 14 years of age or older at the
90 time the alleged delinquent act or violation of law was
91 committed.
92 (3) INVOLUNTARY MANDATORY WAIVER.—
93 (a) If the child was 14 years of age or older, and if the
94 child has been previously adjudicated delinquent for an act
95 classified as a felony, which adjudication was for the
96 commission of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit
97 murder, sexual battery, armed or strong-armed robbery,
98 carjacking, home-invasion robbery, aggravated battery,
99 aggravated assault, or burglary with an assault or battery, and
100 the child is currently charged with a second or subsequent
Page 4 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
101 violent crime against a person; or
102 (b) If the child was 14 years of age or older at the time
103 of commission of a fourth or subsequent alleged felony offense
104 and the child was previously adjudicated delinquent or had
105 adjudication withheld for or was found to have committed, or to
106 have attempted or conspired to commit, three offenses that are
107 felony offenses if committed by an adult, and one or more of
108 such felony offenses involved the use or possession of a firearm
109 or violence against a person;
110
111 the state attorney shall request the court to transfer and
112 certify the child for prosecution as an adult or shall provide
113 written reasons to the court for not making such request, or
114 proceed under s. 985.557(1). Upon the state attorney's request,
115 the court shall either enter an order transferring the case and
116 certifying the case for trial as if the child were an adult or
117 provide written reasons for not issuing such an order.
118 Section 3. Section 985.557, Florida Statutes, is amended
119 to read:
120 985.557 Prosecuting children as adults Direct filing of an
121 information; discretionary criteria.—
122 (1) DISCRETIONARY PROSECUTION OF CHILDREN AS ADULTS DIRECT
123 FILE.—
124 (a) With respect to any child who was 14 or 15 years of
125 age at the time the alleged offense was committed, the state
Page 5 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
126 attorney may file an information when in the state attorney's
127 judgment and discretion the public interest requires that adult
128 sanctions be considered or imposed and when the offense charged
129 is for the commission of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to
130 commit:
131 1. Arson;
132 2. Sexual battery;
133 3. Robbery;
134 4. Kidnapping;
135 5. Aggravated child abuse;
136 6. Aggravated assault;
137 7. Aggravated stalking;
138 8. Murder;
139 9. Manslaughter;
140 10. Unlawful throwing, placing, or discharging of a
141 destructive device or bomb;
142 11. Armed burglary in violation of s. 810.02(2)(b) or
143 specified burglary of a dwelling or structure in violation of s.
144 810.02(2)(c), or burglary with an assault or battery in
145 violation of s. 810.02(2)(a);
146 12. Aggravated battery;
147 13. Any lewd or lascivious offense committed upon or in
148 the presence of a person less than 16 years of age;
149 14. Carrying, displaying, using, threatening, or
150 attempting to use a weapon or firearm during the commission of a
Page 6 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
151 felony;
152 15. Grand theft in violation of s. 812.014(2)(a);
153 16. Possessing or discharging any weapon or firearm on
154 school property in violation of s. 790.115;
155 17. Home invasion robbery;
156 18. Carjacking; or
157 19. Grand theft of a motor vehicle in violation of s.
158 812.014(2)(c)6. or grand theft of a motor vehicle valued at
159 $20,000 or more in violation of s. 812.014(2)(b) if the child
160 has a previous adjudication for grand theft of a motor vehicle
161 in violation of s. 812.014(2)(c)6. or s. 812.014(2)(b).
162 (b) With respect to any child who was 16 or 17 years of
163 age at the time the alleged forcible felony as defined in s.
164 776.08 offense was committed, the state attorney may file an
165 information when in the state attorney's judgment and discretion
166 the public interest requires that adult sanctions be considered
167 or imposed. However, the state attorney may not file an
168 information on a child charged with a misdemeanor, unless the
169 child has had at least two previous adjudications or
170 adjudications withheld for delinquent acts, one of which
171 involved an offense classified as a forcible felony as defined
172 in s. 776.08 under state law.
173 (2) NOTIFICATION TO PARENT OR GUARDIAN.—Upon the filing by
174 the state attorney of an information transferring a child to
175 adult court, the court must advise the child and his or her
Page 7 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
176 parent or legal guardian that the child has the right to a due
177 process evidentiary hearing before a judge.
178 (3) DUE PROCESS EVIDENTIARY HEARING.—Notwithstanding any
179 other law, and in all cases, a child charged with a crime or his
180 or her parent or legal guardian must be afforded a due process
181 evidentiary hearing before a judge after the state attorney
182 files an information in adult court under this section.
183 (a) The judge shall conduct the hearing within 30 days
184 after the information is filed, excluding Saturdays, Sundays,
185 and legal holidays, unless the child or the child's attorney
186 shows good cause for a delay. The purpose of the hearing is for
187 the court to determine whether it is necessary for the
188 community's protection that the child be prosecuted in adult
189 court. The judge shall consider all of the following:
190 1. Evaluations and assessments completed by the
191 department.
192 2. The sophistication and maturity of the child,
193 including:
194 a. The effect, if any, of immaturity, impetuosity, or
195 failure to appreciate risks and consequences on the child's
196 participation in the alleged offense.
197 b. The child's age, maturity, intellectual capacity, and
198 mental and emotional health at the time of the alleged offense.
199 c. The effect, if any, of characteristics attributable to
200 the child's youth on his or her judgment.
Page 8 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
201 3. The record and previous history of the child,
202 including:
203 a. Previous contacts with the department, the Department
204 of Corrections, the Department of Children and Families, other
205 law enforcement agencies, and the courts.
206 b. Prior periods of probation.
207 c. Prior adjudications that the child committed a
208 delinquent act or violation of law, with greater weight being
209 given if a court previously found that the child committed a
210 delinquent act or violation of law involving violence to
211 persons.
212 d. Prior commitments to institutions of the department,
213 the Department of Corrections, or agencies under contract with
214 either department.
215 e. Any history of trauma, abuse or neglect, foster care
216 placements, failed adoption, fetal alcohol syndrome, exposure to
217 controlled substances at birth, or below-average intellectual
218 functioning.
219 f. Identification of the child as a student requiring
220 exceptional student education or having previously received
221 psychological services.
222 4. The nature of the alleged offense and the child's
223 participation in it, including:
224 a. Whether the alleged offense is punishable by death or
225 life imprisonment.
Page 9 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
226 b. Whether the alleged offense was against persons or
227 property.
228 c. Whether the alleged offense is alleged to have been
229 committed in an aggressive, violent, or premeditated manner.
230 d. The extent of the child's participation in the alleged
231 offense.
232 e. The effect, if any, of familial pressure or peer
233 pressure on the child's actions.
234 5. The prospects for adequate protection of the public and
235 the likelihood of reasonable rehabilitation of the child, if the
236 child is found to have committed the alleged offense:
237 a. By the use of procedures, services, and facilities
238 currently available to the juvenile court.
239 b. By the use of procedures, services, and facilities
240 currently available to the adult court, including whether the
241 lowest permissible sentence under the Criminal Punishment Code
242 is a nonstate prison sanction.
243 6. Whether the child could obtain habilitative or
244 rehabilitative services available in the juvenile justice
245 system.
246 7. Whether the child could receive a sentence in juvenile
247 court which would provide adequate safety and protection for the
248 community.
249 8. Whether the child's best interests would be served by
250 prosecuting the child in juvenile court.
Page 10 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
251 (b) The judge may consider any reports that may assist the
252 court, including prior predisposition reports, psychosocial
253 assessments, individual educational plans, developmental
254 assessments, school records, abuse or neglect reports, home
255 studies, protective investigations, and psychological and
256 psychiatric evaluations. The child, the child's parent or legal
257 guardian, the child's defense counsel, and the state attorney
258 may examine these reports and, at the hearing, question the
259 parties responsible for creating such reports.
260 (c) The adult court shall retain jurisdiction unless the
261 court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the factors
262 listed in paragraph (a) support returning the child to juvenile
263 court.
264 (d) The adult court shall render an order that includes
265 specific findings of fact and the reasons for its decision. The
266 prosecution or defense may seek immediate review of the order
267 through interlocutory appeal. The order is reviewable on appeal
268 under the Florida Rules of Appellate Procedure.
269 (4)(2) EFFECT OF PROSECUTING CHILDREN AS ADULTS DIRECT
270 FILE.—
271 (a) Once a child has been transferred for criminal
272 prosecution pursuant to an information and has been found to
273 have committed the presenting offense or a lesser included
274 offense, the child shall be handled thereafter in every respect
275 as if an adult for any subsequent violation of state law, unless
Page 11 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
276 the court imposes juvenile sanctions under s. 985.565.
277 (b) When a child is transferred for criminal prosecution
278 as an adult, the court shall immediately transfer and certify to
279 the adult circuit court all felony cases pertaining to the
280 child, for prosecution of the child as an adult, which have not
281 yet resulted in a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or in which
282 a finding of guilt has not been made. If a child is acquitted of
283 all charged offenses or lesser included offenses contained in
284 the original case transferred to adult court, all felony cases
285 that were transferred to adult court as a result of this
286 paragraph shall be subject to the same penalties to which such
287 cases would have been subject before being transferred to adult
288 court.
289 (c) When a child has been transferred for criminal
290 prosecution as an adult and has been found to have committed a
291 violation of state law, the disposition of the case may be made
292 under s. 985.565 and may include the enforcement of any
293 restitution ordered in any juvenile proceeding.
294 (5)(3) CHARGES THAT MAY BE INCLUDED IN INFORMATION.—An
295 information filed pursuant to this section may include all
296 charges that are based on the same act, criminal episode, or
297 transaction as the primary offenses.
298 Section 4. Subsection (1) of section 985.15, Florida
299 Statutes, is amended to read:
300 985.15 Filing decisions.—
Page 12 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
301 (1) The state attorney may in all cases take action
302 independent of the action or lack of action of the juvenile
303 probation officer and shall determine the action that is in the
304 best interest of the public and the child. If the child meets
305 the criteria requiring prosecution as an adult under s. 985.556,
306 the state attorney shall request the court to transfer and
307 certify the child for prosecution as an adult or shall provide
308 written reasons to the court for not making such a request. In
309 all other cases, The state attorney may:
310 (a) File a petition for dependency;
311 (b) File a petition under chapter 984;
312 (c) File a petition for delinquency;
313 (d) File a petition for delinquency with a motion to
314 transfer and certify the child for prosecution as an adult;
315 (e) File an information under s. 985.557;
316 (f) Refer the case to a grand jury;
317 (g) Refer the child to a diversionary, pretrial
318 intervention, arbitration, or mediation program, or to some
319 other treatment or care program if such program commitment is
320 voluntarily accepted by the child or the child's parents or
321 legal guardian; or
322 (h) Decline to file.
323 Section 5. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (4) of
324 section 985.565, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
325 985.565 Sentencing powers; procedures; alternatives for
Page 13 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
326 juveniles prosecuted as adults.—
327 (4) SENTENCING ALTERNATIVES.—
328 (a) Adult sanctions.—
329 1. Cases prosecuted on indictment.—If the child is found
330 to have committed the offense punishable by death or life
331 imprisonment, the child shall be sentenced as an adult. If the
332 juvenile is not found to have committed the indictable offense
333 but is found to have committed a lesser included offense or any
334 other offense for which he or she was indicted as a part of the
335 criminal episode, the court may sentence as follows:
336 a. As an adult;
337 b. Under chapter 958; or
338 c. As a juvenile under this section.
339 2. Other cases.—If a child who has been transferred for
340 criminal prosecution pursuant to information or waiver of
341 juvenile court jurisdiction is found to have committed a
342 violation of state law or a lesser included offense for which he
343 or she was charged as a part of the criminal episode, the court
344 may sentence as follows:
345 a. As an adult;
346 b. Under chapter 958; or
347 c. As a juvenile under this section.
348 3. Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, if
349 the state attorney is required to file a motion to transfer and
350 certify the juvenile for prosecution as an adult under s.
Page 14 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
351 985.556(3) and that motion is granted, the court must impose
352 adult sanctions.
353 3.4. Any sentence imposing adult sanctions is presumed
354 appropriate, and the court is not required to set forth specific
355 findings or enumerate the criteria in this subsection as any
356 basis for its decision to impose adult sanctions.
357 4.5. When a child has been transferred for criminal
358 prosecution as an adult and has been found to have committed a
359 violation of state law, the disposition of the case may include
360 the enforcement of any restitution ordered in any juvenile
361 proceeding.
362 (b) Juvenile sanctions.—For juveniles transferred to adult
363 court but who do not qualify for such transfer under s.
364 985.556(3), the court may impose juvenile sanctions under this
365 paragraph. If juvenile sentences are imposed, the court shall,
366 under this paragraph, adjudge the child to have committed a
367 delinquent act. Adjudication of delinquency may not be deemed a
368 conviction, nor shall it operate to impose any of the civil
369 disabilities ordinarily resulting from a conviction. The court
370 shall impose an adult sanction or a juvenile sanction and may
371 not sentence the child to a combination of adult and juvenile
372 punishments. An adult sanction or a juvenile sanction may
373 include enforcement of an order of restitution or probation
374 previously ordered in any juvenile proceeding. However, if the
375 court imposes a juvenile sanction and the department determines
Page 15 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
376 that the sanction is unsuitable for the child, the department
377 shall return custody of the child to the sentencing court for
378 further proceedings, including the imposition of adult
379 sanctions. Upon adjudicating a child delinquent under subsection
380 (1), the court may:
381 1. Place the child in a probation program under the
382 supervision of the department for an indeterminate period of
383 time until the child reaches the age of 19 years or sooner if
384 discharged by order of the court.
385 2. Commit the child to the department for treatment in an
386 appropriate program for children for an indeterminate period of
387 time until the child is 21 or sooner if discharged by the
388 department. The department shall notify the court of its intent
389 to discharge no later than 14 days before discharge. Failure of
390 the court to timely respond to the department's notice shall be
391 considered approval for discharge.
392 3. Order disposition under ss. 985.435, 985.437, 985.439,
393 985.441, 985.45, and 985.455 as an alternative to youthful
394 offender or adult sentencing if the court determines not to
395 impose youthful offender or adult sanctions.
396
397 It is the intent of the Legislature that the criteria and
398 guidelines in this subsection are mandatory and that a
399 determination of disposition under this subsection is subject to
400 the right of the child to appellate review under s. 985.534.
Page 16 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 295 2026
401 Section 6. Subsection (55) of section 985.03, Florida
402 Statutes, is amended to read:
403 985.03 Definitions.—As used in this chapter, the term:
404 (55) "Waiver hearing" means a hearing provided for under
405 s. 985.556(3) s. 985.556(4).
406 Section 7. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 17 of 17
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb295-00